Utah statutes.
59-12-302.   Collection of tax -- Administrative fee.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) or (3), the tax authorized under this part shall be administered, collected, and enforced in accordance with:

(a)  the same procedures used to administer, collect, and enforce the tax under:

(i)  Part 1, Tax Collection; or

(ii)  Part 2, Local Sales and Use Tax Act; and

(b)  Chapter 1, General Taxation Policies.

(2)  The location of a transaction shall be determined in accordance with Sections 59-12-211 through 59-12-215.

(3)  A tax under this part is not subject to Section 59-12-107.1 or 59-12-123 or Subsections 59-12-205(2) through (6).

(4)  The commission:

(a)  shall distribute the revenues collected from the tax to the county within which the revenues were collected; and

(b)  shall retain and deposit an administrative charge in accordance with Section 59-1-306 from revenues the commission collects from a tax under this part.



Amended by Chapter 288, 2011 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 309, 2011 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Amended by Chapter 309, 2011 General Session

